District of Columbia statutes.
4-1402

“Child-placing agency” defined; license required.

(a)

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or public agency that receives or accepts a child under 16 years of age and places or offers to place such child for temporary or permanent care in a family home other than that of a relative within the third degree shall be deemed to be maintaining a child-placing agency. No child-placing agency shall be maintained in the District of Columbia without a license issued by the Mayor of the District of Columbia; provided, that notwithstanding any provisions of § 4-1404 such a license shall be issued forthwith to any corporation or association chartered by special act of Congress and having under its charter the purposes or powers of a child-placing agency as herein defined.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 193, ch. 174, § 2
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-59, § 2(a), 27 DCR 983
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(z), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(f), 50 DCR 6913
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
1973 Ed., § 32-782.
1981 Ed., § 32-1002.
This section is referenced in § 4-1305.01.